North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-06 General Provisions
54-06-17.
Certain rental-purchase-type agreements authorized.

With the approval of the office of management and budget, any department, agency, or institution of the state currently leasing or renting office equipment under an agreement that is convertible to a rental-purchase or similar agreement, upon certification to the office of management and budget that conversion of such leasing or rental agreement to a rental-purchase or similar agreement is to the financial advantage of the state and does not commit the state to payments thereon beyond the biennium for which funds are available, may convert such rental or leasing agreement to such rental-purchase-type agreement.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 468, § 1.

54-06-18.
Director to authorize postage meters.

A state agency, department, or institution, except the institutions under the control and management of the board of higher education, may not obtain or use a postage meter unless authorized to do so by the director of the office of management and budget. Each state agency, department, or institution which is authorized by the director to obtain or use a postage meter shall maintain such records as the director may require and shall allow the director to inspect such records upon request. The office of management and budget shall keep a record of the identification numbers of all postage meters authorized for usage.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 469, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 30; 1999, ch. 407, § 2.

54-06-19.
Appointive boards, commissions, committees, and councils — Gender balance.

Appointments to boards, commissions, committees, and councils of the state established by this code, if not otherwise provided by law, should be gender balanced to the extent possible and to the extent that appointees are qualified to serve on those boards, commissions, committees, and councils. Any appointment in accordance with this section should be made in a manner that strives to seek gender balance based on the numbers of each gender belonging to the group from which appointments are made. Ex officio members are not to be included in determining gender balance under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 635, § 1.

54-06-20.
Indigent civil legal services fund — Distribution — Continuing appropriation — Records.

An advisory committee consisting of the lieutenant governor, the director of the office of management and budget or the director’s designee, and the state court administrator shall distribute moneys deposited in the indigent civil legal services fund. Qualified legal service programs may apply for moneys in the fund. The moneys in the fund must be distributed to legal service programs operating in the state which provide, with funds appropriated by the federal legal services corporation, legal services to persons unable to afford private counsel. Allocation of funds among the programs must be based on the population served by each program, the range of legal services offered, alternative sources of funding, and other factors deemed relevant by the advisory committee. The moneys deposited in the indigent civil legal services fund in the state treasury are hereby appropriated to the advisory committee on a continuing basis for the purpose of implementing and administering a program to provide civil legal assistance to indigent individuals.

Recipients of funds distributed by the advisory committee shall comply with the federal Legal Services Corporation Act [42 U.S.C. 2996 et seq.].

Subject to the limitations in this section, funds distributed under subsection 1 may be used to provide legal services to persons unable to afford private counsel in the following types of cases:

Public benefits, including temporary assistance to needy families, unemployment compensation, general assistance, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, supplemental security income, or social security disability income;

Medical assistance;

Family law matters;

Housing;

Consumer issues; and

Elder law.

The advisory committee and each recipient of funds from the indigent civil legal services fund shall maintain records in accord with the generally accepted accounting principles. The records must account for the receipt and expenditure of all funds distributed and received and must be maintained for a period of five years from the close of the fiscal year in which the funds are distributed or received or until audited, whichever is sooner.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 150, §§ 2-4; 1997, ch. 439, § 1; 2013, ch. 367, § 7.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-06-21.
Public employee personnel records — Administration — Access.

The official personnel file on each employee is the file maintained under the supervision of the agency head or the agency head’s designated representative.

No documents that address an employee’s character or performance may be placed in the file unless the employee has had the opportunity to read the material. The employee must acknowledge that the employee has read the material by signing the actual copy to be filed or an attachment to the actual copy to be filed, with the understanding that the signature merely signifies that the employee has read the material to be filed and does not necessarily indicate agreement with its content. If the employee refuses to sign the copy to be filed, the agency head or the agency head’s designated representative shall indicate on the copy that the employee was shown the material, was requested to sign the material to verify that the material had been read, and that the employee refused to sign the copy to be filed. In the presence of the employee and a witness, the agency head or the agency head’s designated representative shall sign and date a statement verifying the refusal of the employee to sign the copy to be filed. The material must then be placed in the file.

The employee has the right to answer any material filed and any answer must be attached to the file copy. The employee’s answer to material filed may not be used as the basis for any subsequent adverse personnel action. If any material is found to be without merit or unfounded through an established grievance procedure, it must be immediately removed from the file and may not be used in any subsequent actions or proceedings against the employee.

The employee or the employee’s designated representative must be permitted to examine the employee’s official personnel file by appointment during normal business hours.

No anonymous letters or materials may be placed in the employee’s file.

The employee must be permitted to reproduce at the employee’s expense any material in the employee’s file.

An employee may file a grievance regarding nonevaluation material placed in the employee’s personnel file. A grievance is limited to an internal agency grievance unless such material is merged into a disciplinary proceeding.

This section does not prohibit administrators from maintaining written notes or records of an employee’s performance separate from the personnel file for the purpose of preparing evaluations or possible disciplinary action.

Administrators are encouraged to place in the employee’s file information of a positive nature, including any such material received from outside competent and responsible sources, indicating special competencies, achievements, performances, or contributions of a professional or civic nature.

Except when the employing agency inserts only salary, insurance, medical, tax, workforce safety and insurance, pretax benefits, or deferred compensation information or employment forms, a record of access must be maintained by the employing agency and must be provided to the employee when the employee examines the employee’s file. As used in this section, the term “public employee” means any person employed by the state and does not include persons employed by any political subdivision of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 571, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 500, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

54-06-22.
Crime victims’ account — Administration.

The agency designated by the governor to administer the victims’ assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984 [42 U.S.C. 10601 et seq.] shall administer a crime victims’ account in the state treasury. The moneys in the account must be distributed through grants to the crime victims’ compensation program; private, nonprofit domestic violence or sexual assault programs; and to victim and witness advocacy programs whose primary function is to provide direct services to victims of and witnesses to crimes. The administering agency shall establish procedures for the distribution of grants.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 572, § 1; 1995, ch. 513, § 2.

54-06-23.
Child care services provided by state agency or institution.

A state agency or institution may provide for child care services to the children of employees, students, or clients of the agency or institution in accordance with this section. Child care services may be provided by the institution only after the head of the agency or institution determines there is a need for the services and that the services will be provided at rates that are not less than the average rates charged by private child care providers providing comparable services in the community. Child care services may be provided in space available within the facility housing the agency or institution. An agency or institution may operate a child care center in available space or contract with a child care provider for child care services. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the agency or institution may provide utilities and custodial and maintenance services for the child care center. Additional operating costs, including the salaries for a director and staff and the cost of supplies, must be borne by the center. A child care center provided for by an agency or institution may provide child care services to the children of employees, students, or clients of the agency or institution and, to the extent space is available, to any other children.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 511, § 1.

54-06-24.
State employee suggestion incentive program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 512, § 1; 1999, ch. 447, § 1; 2013, ch. 400, § 1; 2019, ch. 40, § 22, effective July 1, 2019; repealed by 2019, ch. 40, § 31, effective July 1, 2021.

54-06-24.1.
Telecommuting incentive program for state employees. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 2001, ch. 474, § 2.

54-06-25.
State employees compensation commission — Appointment of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 513, § 1; 1995, ch. 501, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 432, § 24; 1997, ch. 440, § 1; 2003, ch. 461, § 1; 2003, ch. 493, § 4; 2009, ch. 482, §§
46, 97; 2017, ch. 239, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2021, ch. 15, § 39, effective July 1, 2021.

54-06-26.
Use of state telephones by state officials and employees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an appointed or elected state official or a state employee may use a state telephone to receive or place a local call for essential personal purposes to the extent that use does not interfere with the functions of the official’s or employee’s agency, department, or institution. Each state agency, department, or institution may establish guidelines defining reasonable and appropriate use of state telephones for essential personal purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 441, § 1; 2017, ch. 239, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-06-27.
Emergency service volunteers — Leave.

Upon issuance of an order or proclamation declaring a state of disaster or emergency pursuant to chapter 37-17.1, a search emergency by the air force rescue coordination center or by the department of emergency services, or a declaration of at least a level II disaster by the American red cross in this or any other state, the executive officer in charge of a state agency or the governing body of any political subdivision may grant a leave of absence to any full-time employee of that governmental entity who is an emergency medical service provider, a member of the civil air patrol, a firefighter, police officer, volunteer member of the North Dakota army or air national guard, or emergency radio operator, or who performs other services necessary in an emergency. The leave of absence must be for the purpose of allowing that employee to provide voluntary emergency services. An individual on leave under this section is not deemed to be an employee of the governmental entity for the purposes of workforce safety and insurance. The cumulative leave granted under this section may not exceed twenty working days during any calendar year. The leave may not result in a loss of compensation, seniority, annual leave, sick leave, or accrued overtime for which the employee is otherwise eligible.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 448, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 16, § 15; 2009, ch. 313, § 2.

54-06-28.
Emergency service volunteers — Temporary leave for firefighters, emergency radio operators, medical service providers, and civil air patrol.

The executive officer in charge of a state agency or the governing body of any political subdivision may grant temporary short-term leave with compensation to any full-time employee of that governmental entity for the purpose of allowing the employee to respond to an emergency call if the employee is a volunteer emergency medical service provider, firefighter, emergency radio operator, or a member of the civil air patrol.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 448, § 2.

54-06-29.
Expenses incurred to collect funds owed the state — Continuing appropriation.

If a state agency enters a contract with a collection or credit agency to collect money due the state, the fees for services, reimbursement, or other remuneration to the collection or credit agency must be based on the amount of money actually collected. All funds collected on behalf of a state agency by a collection or credit agency must be deposited with the state treasurer. An amount equal to the amount of fees for services, reimbursement, or any other remuneration to the collection or credit agency as set forth in the contract is appropriated from the fund into which the money collected was deposited to the state agency for which the funds were collected for the payment of fees due under the contract.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 37, § 29.

54-06-30.
State employee performance bonus program — Criteria — Limitations.

State agencies may provide monetary performance bonuses to their employees under this section.

State agencies may pay bonuses under this section if:

The agency has had a written employee performance evaluation policy in place for more than one year before paying the bonus;

The written employee performance evaluation policy required in subdivision a must have at least three levels of performance criteria; and

The agency performance bonus program adopted under this section must be a written policy and must be communicated to each employee in the agency. Development of the written policy must include input from employees.

State employees are eligible to receive a bonus under this section only if:

The employee has held a position in state government for at least one year before a bonus is paid;

The employee’s overall annual performance evaluation satisfies the agency’s performance bonus program criteria for receiving a bonus; and

The employee is a full-time or part-time regular nonprobationary employee holding a regularly funded nontemporary position.

An employee may not receive more than one performance bonus per fiscal year and may not receive more than one thousand five hundred dollars in bonuses per fiscal year.

Each agency must fund the performance bonus program from within its agency budget for salaries and wages.

Bonuses paid under this section may not be included in an employee’s base salary for purposes of calculating any wage or salary increase.

Bonuses paid under this section are not fiscal irregularities under section 54-14-03.1.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 475, § 1; 2003, ch. 462, § 1; 2009, ch. 458, § 1; 2019, ch. 40, § 23, effective July 1, 2019.

54-06-31.
State employee recruitment and retention bonus programs — Criteria — Limitations.

State agencies may develop programs to provide bonuses to recruit or retain employees in hard-to-fill occupations.

State agencies may pay recruitment and retention bonuses under this section only if:

The agency has a written policy in place identifying eligible positions or occupations and provisions for providing and receiving bonuses;

The agency has filed a copy of the written policy with the North Dakota human resource management services; and

The agency reports to the North Dakota human resource management services each bonus provided to an employee under the program.

State agencies must fund bonus programs from within the agency salaries and wages budget.

The North Dakota human resource management services shall report periodically to the legislative management on the implementation, progress, and bonuses provided under agency recruitment and retention bonus programs.

Bonuses paid under this section are not fiscal irregularities under section 54-14-03.1.

As used in this section, a hard-to-fill occupation includes an occupation or position in which demand exceeds supply, special qualifications are required, competition with other employers is the strongest, there is a risk of losing an incumbent with rare skills, the position is filled by a highly skilled employee who is in high demand in the marketplace, loss of the employee would result in significant replacement costs, the position is filled by key personnel, or the position has other unique recruitment or retention issues identified and documented by the appointing authority.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 476, § 1; 2003, ch. 462, § 2; 2009, ch. 459, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
47.

54-06-32.
State employee service awards.

Each state agency, department, or institution may establish rules or policies for employee recognition and service award programs. Executive branch agencies having employees in classified service are subject to rules adopted by North Dakota human resource management services and approved by the state personnel board and the legislative management’s administrative rules committee. Any other agency, department, or institution of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch may adopt similar rules or policies to ensure uniformity and consistency in state government. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each executive branch state agency, department, or institution, except an institution of higher education, having employees who are not in classified service and establishing rules or policies for employee recognition and service award programs shall submit the rules and policies to the office of management and budget for review and comment, and after addressing any comments of the office of management and budget, shall submit the rules and policies to the legislative management’s administrative rules committee for approval. Within sixty days after the close of each biennial period, each state agency, department, or institution providing an employee service award under rules approved by the administrative rules committee shall file with the office of management and budget a report indicating the total amount of service awards paid. Within ninety days after the close of each biennial period, the office of management and budget shall submit to the legislative council a report summarizing this information. An expenditure made under this section is deemed to be made for a public purpose and may not be construed as a gift for purposes of section 18 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 460, § 1; 2013, ch. 401, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 401, S.L. 2013 became effective April 18, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of ch. 401, S.L. 2013.

54-06-33.
Employer-paid tuition.

Each state agency, department, or institution may establish rules or policies to provide employer-paid costs of training or educational courses, including tuition and fees, within budgetary constraints. Executive branch agencies having employees in classified service are subject to rules adopted by North Dakota human resource management services and approved by the state personnel board and the legislative management’s administrative rules committee. Any other state agency, department, or institution of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch may adopt rules or policies to ensure uniformity and consistency in state government. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each executive branch state agency, department, or institution, except an institution of higher education, having employees who are not in classified service and establishing rules or policies for employer-paid costs of training or educational courses, including tuition and fees, shall submit the rules and policies to the office of management and budget for review and comment, and after addressing any comments of the office of management and budget, shall submit the rules and policies to the legislative management’s administrative rules committee for approval. Within sixty days after the close of each biennial period, each state agency, department, or institution providing employer-paid costs of training or educational courses, including tuition and fees, under rules approved by the administrative rules committee, shall file with the office of management and budget a report indicating the total employer-paid costs of training and educational courses, including tuition and fees. Within ninety days after the close of each biennial period, the office of management and budget shall submit to the legislative council a report summarizing this information. An employee who receives employer-paid tuition reported under this section who leaves employment with the state within two years of receiving the tuition must repay tuition received under this section on a prorated basis. An expenditure for employer-paid training or educational courses, including tuition and fees, under this section is deemed to be made for a public purpose and may not be construed as a gift for purposes of section 18 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 460, § 2; 2013, ch. 401, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 401, S.L. 2013 became effective April 18, 2013 pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 401, S.L. 2013..

54-06-34.
Employer-paid professional organization membership and service club dues.

Each state agency, department, or institution may pay employee membership dues for professional organizations and membership dues for service clubs when required to do business or if the membership is primarily for the benefit of the state. Within sixty days after the close of each biennial period, each executive branch state agency, department, or institution, except an institution of higher education, providing employer-paid professional organization membership and service club dues shall file with the office of management and budget a report indicating the total employer-paid professional organization membership and service club dues. Within ninety days after the close of each biennial period, the office of management and budget shall submit to the legislative council a report summarizing this information. An expenditure made under this section is deemed to be made for a public purpose and may not be construed as a gift for purposes of section 18 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 460, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 401, S.L. 2013 became effective April 18, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of ch. 401, S.L. 2013.

54-06-35.
Expenditure made pursuant to rule or policy.

An expenditure made pursuant to a rule or policy adopted pursuant to sections 54-06-32 through 54-06-34 is not a criminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 460, § 4.

54-06-36.
Honor guard leave.

Honor guard leave is an approved absence from work, with pay, of up to twenty-four working hours per calendar year for an employee to participate in an honor guard for a funeral service of a veteran. A governmental entity may grant a request for honor guard leave even if the absence of the employee might interfere with the normal operations of the agency. This section applies to each governmental entity that employs an individual in a position classified by human resource management services.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 392, § 1.

54-06-37.
Authorization to purchase or lease aircraft — Legislative assembly or budget section approval — Exception.

As used in this section, “airworthy” means an aircraft conforms to its type design and is in a condition for safe operation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, a state agency or other entity of state government may not purchase or lease a manned aircraft without specific authorization from the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9.

In an emergency circumstance, a state agency, department, or institution may lease a manned aircraft without approval from the legislative assembly or the budget section if an aircraft currently leased or owned by the state agency, department, or institution is not airworthy. The emergency lease under this subsection may extend only until the aircraft deemed not airworthy is determined to be airworthy.

A state agency, department, or institution may purchase a replacement aircraft without approval from the legislative assembly or the budget section if an aircraft is destroyed beyond repair and only insurance proceeds are used for the purchase of the replacement aircraft. If the purchase price of a replacement aircraft exceeds the insurance proceeds, the state agency, department, or institution must receive authorization in accordance with subsection 2.

This section does not apply to aircraft purchased or leased by the office of the adjutant general or the university of North Dakota school of aviation.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 221, § 1; 2019, ch. 431, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 438, § 12, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-06-37 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 431, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1230; and Section 12 of Chapter 438, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2055.

54-06-38.
Harassment policies.

Each state agency, department, and institution shall adopt and enforce a policy on employee harassment, including sexual harassment. The policy must clearly define harassment and specify the responsibilities of the employee, supervisor, and the agency, department, or institution. If an agency, department, or institution does not adopt a harassment policy, the agency, department, or institution must be subject to the policy adopted by the North Dakota human resource management services division.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 371, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.